Missouri, session 2026, HB2745.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 210.110, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 210.110, to read as follows:
210.110. As used in sections 210.109 to 210.165, and sections 210.180 to 210.183,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", any physical injury, sexual abuse, or emotional abuse inflicted on a child
other than by accidental means by those responsible for the child's care, custody, and control,
except that discipline including spanking, administered in a reasonable manner, shall not be
construed to be abuse. Victims of abuse shall also include any victims of sex trafficking or
severe forms of trafficking as those terms are defined in 22 U.S.C. Section 7102, as amended;
(2) "Assessment and treatment services for children", an approach to be developed by
the children's division which will recognize and treat the specific needs of at-risk and abused
or neglected children. The developmental and medical assessment may be a broad physical,
developmental, and mental health screening [to be completed within thirty days of a child's
entry into custody and] that shall be in accordance with the time frames set forth under
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subdivision and the periodicity schedule set forth by the
American Academy of Pediatrics thereafter as long as the child remains in care. Screenings
may be offered at a centralized location and shall include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) Within seventy-two hours upon entry into custody, a [complete] physical to be
performed by a [pediatrician] physician or nurse practitioner familiar with the effects of
abuse [and] or neglect on young children. The physician or nurse practitioner who
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2745 2
performs the physical under this paragraph shall also request the child's past medical
records, and a foster family of the child shall have access to all medical records under
this paragraph. If medical records indicate that an evaluation has been completed and
such evaluation indicated a need for developmental, behavioral, and emotional
treatment, best efforts shall be made to provide or, if such treatment is being
provided, continue such care with the current provider or another provider if such
provider is not available. Any person receiving such request shall fulfill the request
within thirty days of placement. No vaccine shall be administered during the physical
without the consent of the biological parent; and
(b) Within thirty days of the physical under paragraph (a) of this subdivision, a
referral for a developmental, behavioral, and emotional screening in addition to early
periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment services, including a core set of standardized and
recognized instruments as well as interviews with the child and appropriate caregivers. The
screening battery may be performed by a licensed mental health professional familiar with the
effects of abuse [and] or neglect on young children or a primary care physician using a
standardized assessment tool, who will then serve as the liaison between all service
providers in ensuring that needed services are provided. Such treatment services may include
in-home services, out-of-home placement, intensive twenty-four-hour treatment services,
family counseling, parenting training and other best practices.

Children whose screenings indicate an area of concern may complete a comprehensive, in-
depth health, psychodiagnostic, or developmental assessment within sixty days of entry into
custody;
(3) "Central registry", a registry of persons where the division has found probable
cause to believe prior to August 28, 2004, or by a preponderance of the evidence after August
28, 2004, or a court has substantiated through court adjudication that the individual has
committed child abuse or neglect or the person has pled guilty or has been found guilty of a
crime pursuant to section 565.020, 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.050, 566.030, 566.060, or
567.050 if the victim is a child less than eighteen years of age, or any other crime pursuant to
chapter 566 if the victim is a child less than eighteen years of age and the perpetrator is
twenty-one years of age or older, a crime under section 568.020, 568.030, 568.045, 568.050,
568.060, 568.080, 568.090, 573.023, 573.025, 573.035, 573.037, 573.040, 573.200, or
573.205, or an attempt to commit any such crimes. Any persons placed on the registry prior
to August 28, 2004, shall remain on the registry for the duration of time required by section
210.152;
(4) "Child", any person, regardless of physical or mental condition, under eighteen
years of age;

HCS HB 2745 3
(5) "Children's services providers and agencies", any public, quasi-public, or private
entity with the appropriate and relevant training and expertise in delivering services to
children and their families as determined by the children's division, and capable of providing
direct services and other family services for children in the custody of the children's division
or any such entities or agencies that are receiving state moneys for such services;
(6) "Director", the director of the Missouri children's division within the department
of social services;
(7) "Division", the Missouri children's division within the department of social
services;
(8) "Family assessment and services", an approach to be developed by the children's
division which will provide for a prompt assessment of a child who has been reported to the
division as a victim of abuse or neglect by a person responsible for that child's care, custody
or control and of that child's family, including risk of abuse and neglect and, if necessary, the
provision of community-based services to reduce the risk and support the family;
(9) "Family support team meeting" or "team meeting", a meeting convened by the
division or children's services provider in behalf of the family and/or child for the purpose of
determining service and treatment needs, determining the need for placement and developing
a plan for reunification or other permanency options, determining the appropriate placement
of the child, evaluating case progress, and establishing and revising the case plan;
(10) "Investigation", the collection of physical and [verbal] oral evidence to
determine if a child has been abused or neglected;
(11) "Jail or detention center personnel", employees and volunteers working in any
premises or institution where incarceration, evaluation, care, treatment or rehabilitation is
provided to persons who are being held under custody of the law;
(12) "Neglect", failure to provide, by those responsible for the care, custody, and
control of the child, the proper or necessary support, education as required by law, nutrition or
medical, surgical, or any other care necessary for the child's well-being, except that neglect
shall not be found by virtue of the sole fact that a person allows a child to engage in
independent activities without adult supervision including, but not limited to, traveling to or
from school or nearby locations by bicycle or on foot, playing outdoors, or remaining at home
for a reasonable period of time, provided such activities are appropriate based on the child's
age, maturity, and physical and mental abilities, and the lack of adult supervision does not
constitute conduct that is so grossly negligent as to endanger the health or safety of the child.
Victims of neglect shall also include any victims of sex trafficking or severe forms of
trafficking as those terms are defined in 22 U.S.C. Section 7102, as amended;

HCS HB 2745 4
(13) "Preponderance of the evidence", that degree of evidence that is of greater
weight or more convincing than the evidence which is offered in opposition to it or evidence
which as a whole shows the fact to be proved to be more probable than not;
(14) "Probable cause", available facts when viewed in the light of surrounding
circumstances which would cause a reasonable person to believe a child was abused or
neglected;
(15) "Report", the communication of an allegation of child abuse or neglect to the
division pursuant to section 210.115;
(16) "Those responsible for the care, custody, and control of the child", includes, but
100 is not limited to:
101 (a) The parents or legal guardians of a child;
102 (b) Other members of the child's household;
103 (c) Those exercising supervision over a child for any part of a twenty-four-hour day;
104 (d) Any adult person who has access to the child based on relationship to the parents
105 of the child or members of the child's household or the family;
106 (e) Any person who takes control of the child by deception, force, or coercion; or
107 (f) School personnel, contractors, and volunteers, if the relationship with the child
108 was established through the school or through school-related activities, even if the alleged
109 abuse or neglect occurred outside of school hours or off school grounds.
✔